Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB357.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 29A.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the request of a prospective juror prior to assignment to a trial court, the Chief
Circuit Judge, or after the juror's assignment to a trial court, the trial judge may
excuse such juror upon a showing of undue hardship, extreme inconvenience, or
public necessity. On the day[ on which] the prospective jurors are summonsed to
appear, any person not previously excused who desires to be excused shall be
heard.
(2) The Chief Circuit Judge may designate and authorize one (1) or more judges of the
court, the court's clerk, a deputy clerk, the court's administrator, or a deputy court
administrator to excuse a juror from service for a period not to exceed ten (10) days
or to postpone jury service for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months. The
reasons for excuse or postponement shall be entered in the space provided on the
juror qualification form.
(3) In his or her discretion the judge may excuse a juror from service entirely, reduce
the number of days of service, or may postpone the juror's service temporarily for a
period of time not to exceed[, however,] twenty-four (24) months. Whenever
possible the judge shall favor temporary postponement of service or reduced service
over permanent excuse. When excusing a juror, the judge shall record the juror's
name, as provided in KRS 29A.080, and the reasons for granting the excuse.
(4) The judge shall excuse a:
(a) Mother who is breastfeeding a child or expressing breastmilk from jury
service until such time as the child is old enough that the mother is no longer
breastfeeding the child; and
(b) Teacher until the end of the current school term as defined in KRS 158.070
if the Commonwealth is experiencing a teacher shortage.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/12/2026 4:17 PM Jacketed